Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1889.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1361 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1361. When Provided.--* * *(4) (i) The board of school directors in a school district shall determine whether a school bus stop or school vehicle stop established within the boundaries of the school district is located within three hundred (300) feet of the residence of an individual convicted of an offense specified under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.14 (relating to sexual offenses and tier system).(ii) Upon the determination that a school bus stop or school vehicle stop meets the location requirements specified under 1234567891011121314151617181920 subparagraph (i), the board of school directors shall provide notice to the parents or guardians of a child assigned to the school bus stop or school vehicle stop. The notice must include:(A) A statement explaining that the school bus stop or school vehicle stop is located within three hundred (300) feet of the residence of an individual convicted of an offense specified under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.14.(B) A mechanism for a parent or guardian of the child to request an alternate school bus stop or school vehicle stop for the child.(iii) A request under subparagraph (ii)(B) must be made within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice under subparagraph (ii).(iv) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of a request under subparagraph (ii)(B), the board of school directors shall grant the request and shall establish an alternate school bus stop or school vehicle stop for the child that is situated at least three hundred (300) feet from the residence of an individual convicted of an offense specified under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.14.(v) As used in this paragraph, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subparagraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School bus." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."School vehicle." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1889PN2350 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526